Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2544SC (1) 91 ll/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 335.15, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. To authorize on appeal, in specific 3 cases, such variance from the terms of the ordinance 4 with respect to the area, dimensional, or other numerical 5 limitations as will not be contrary to the public interest, 6 where owing to special conditions a literal enforcement of 7 the provisions of the ordinance will result in practical 8 difficulties to the property owner in making a beneficial use 9 of the property allowed by the zoning ordinance, and so that 10 the spirit of the ordinance shall be observed and substantial 11 justice done. Area, dimensional, or other numerical 12 limitations subject to variances include but are not limited 13 to requirements for minimum lot size, setbacks, yard widths, 14 height, bulk, sidewalks, fencing, signage, and off-street 15 parking. To receive the requested area, dimensional, or 16 other numerical variance, the property owner must prove that 17 the practical difficulties faced are unique to the property 18 at issue and not self-created and must also demonstrate 19 that granting the variance will not significantly alter the 20 essential character of the surrounding neighborhood. 21 Sec. 2. Section 414.12, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 22 following new subsection: 23 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. To authorize on appeal, in specific 24 cases, such variance from the terms of the ordinance 25 with respect to the area, dimensional, or other numerical 26 limitations as will not be contrary to the public interest, 27 where owing to special conditions a literal enforcement of 28 the provisions of the ordinance will result in practical 29 difficulties to the property owner in making a beneficial use 30 of the property allowed by the zoning ordinance, and so that 31 the spirit of the ordinance shall be observed and substantial 32 justice done. Area, dimensional, or other numerical 33 limitations subject to variances include but are not limited 34 to requirements for minimum lot size, setbacks, yard widths, 35 -1- LSB 2544SC (1) 91 ll/js 1/ 3 S.F. _____ height, bulk, sidewalks, fencing, signage, and off-street 1 parking. To receive the requested area, dimensional, or 2 other numerical variance, the property owner must prove that 3 the practical difficulties faced are unique to the property 4 at issue and not self-created and must also demonstrate 5 that granting the variance will not significantly alter the 6 essential character of the surrounding neighborhood. 7